Utah statutes.
23-30-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "General predator control" means a predatory animal removal effort by the division to reduce predatory animal numbers for the benefit of mule deer.

(2)  "Predatory animal" means a coyote.

(3)  "Targeted predator control" means a predatory animal removal effort by the division:

(a)  to reduce predatory animal numbers in an area where mule deer predation occurs; and

(b)  that focuses on specific locations and certain times.

